District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.11

Coverage of restored employees.

An employee enrolled in a health benefit plan under § 1-621.02 who is removed or suspended without pay and later reinstated or restored to duty on the ground that the removal or suspension was unwarranted or unjustified may, at the employee’s option, enroll as a new employee or have the employee’s coverage restored, with appropriate adjustments made in contributions and claims, to the same extent and effect as though the removal or suspension had not taken place.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2111
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(d), 34 DCR 5079
1981 Ed., § 1-622.11.